test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Gåetie_Noun_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - buaradahke: # 2+2, stem -e, root vowel e-
  
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Nom: buaradahke
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Acc: buaradahkem
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Gen: buaradahken
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Ill: buaradahkese
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Ela: buaradahkeste
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Ine: buaradahkesne
    buaradahke+N+Sg+Com: buaradahkine
    buaradahke+N+Ess: buaradahkine
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Nom: buaradahkh
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Acc: buaradahkide
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Gen: buaradahki
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Ill: buaradahkide
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Ela: buaradahkijste
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Ine: buaradahkine
    buaradahke+N+Pl+Com: buaradahkigujmie

  Noun - gåetie: # stem -ie, root vowel åe-
  
    gåetie+N+Sg+Nom: gåetie
    gåetie+N+Sg+Acc: gåetiem
    gåetie+N+Sg+Gen: gåetien
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ill: gåatan
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ela: gåeteste
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ine: gåetesne
    gåetie+N+Sg+Com: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Ess: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Nom: gåetieh
    gåetie+N+Pl+Acc: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Gen: [gåetiej, gööti]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ill: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ine: [gåetine, göötine]    
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ela:  [gåetijste, göötijste]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Com: [gåetiejgujmie, göötigujmie]
